Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB622.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 13(f) introductory paragraph of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 13. Prohibited Acts; Penalties.--* * *(f) [Any] Except as provided in subsection (f.1), any person who violates clause (12), (14) or (30) of subsection (a) with respect to:* * *12345678910111213141516171819202122 (f.1) An individual who knowingly or intentionally violates clause (12), (14) or (30) of subsection (a) with respect to fentanyl or an analogue of fentanyl, or a controlled substance or counterfeit substance containing a trace of fentanyl or an analogue of fentanyl, is guilty of a felony and upon conviction thereof shall be sentenced to imprisonment not exceeding twenty years, or to pay a fine not exceeding five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), or both.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0622PN0633 - 2 - 12345678910